incubator/apertium-krc/tests/miscellaneous.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../krc.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../krc.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] Miscellaneous":
    агрессор<n><pl><gen> : агрессорланы
    айны<v><tv><gpr_fut2> : айнырыкъ
    аквариум<n><pl><px1pl><loc> : аквариумларыбызда
    алам<n><loc><attr> : аламдагъы
    архитектор<n><pl><nom> : архитекторла
    ал<v><tv><gna_until> : алгъынча
    акъырын<adj><comp> : акъырыныракъ
    ач<v><tv><ger_past><pl><dat> : ачханлагъа
    ач<v><tv><ger_past><abl> : ачхандан
    бегемот<n><pl><nom> : бегемотла
    кёзюу<n><px3sp><loc> : кёзюуюнде
    кёзюу<n><px3sp><acc> : кёзюуюню
    тёлеу<n><px3sp><nom> : тёлеую 
